Massachusetts, session 194th, H2557.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as “The Massachusetts Trauma
Response Preparedness Act”.
SECTION 2. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting the following new section:-
"Section 237. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Public Building”, (1) Any state or local government building that is used for a public
purpose, including but not limited to, public schools, town or city halls, libraries, transportation
facilities, and senior centers; or (2) any building that is regularly used by the general public - or
of 3

funded by public sources - with a listed maximum occupancy of at least 300 persons, including
but not limited to private and parochial schools, places of worship, meeting halls, recreational
facilities, entertainment venues, and sporting venues
“Trauma Kit”, a kit designed to contain materials to help a general bystander provide first
aid to another citizen suffering from a serious, life threatening bleed. At minimum kits must
include an adequate tourniquet, gauze, gloves, and a proper training booklet as defined by the
American College of Surgeons or an equivalent organization
“Trauma Kit Designee”, a person trained and certified by a representative of the
American College of Surgeons or an equivalent organization in the area of bleeding control
(b) All public buildings as defined by subsection (a) as well as any buildings required to
house an AED pursuant to section 78A of chapter 93 and section 54C of chapter 71 shall be
required to have clearly visible, centrally located, and easily accessible trauma kits as defined by
subsection (a) ready for use at all times. The number of trauma kits required per building shall
be determined by a formula, which shall take into account the maximum capacity of said
building, to be promulgated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services. Said formula shall
be informed by the research of the American College of Surgeons.
(c) Any building falling under the purview of subsection (b) shall be required to have on
staff an appropriately qualified trauma kit designee as defined by subsection (a) at all times
(d) For the purposes of organizational efficiency, buildings falling under the purview of
subsections (b) and (c) as well as section 78A of chapter 93 or section 54C of chapter 71 may
share the same storage space for the AED device and the trauma kit as well as designate the same
person both an AED provider and Trauma Kit Designee
of 3

(e) Any person who, in good faith, attempts to render emergency care including, but not
limited to, bleeding control, and does so without compensation, shall not be liable for acts or
omissions, other than gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, resulting from the
attempt to render such emergency care."
SECTION 3. Section 8A of Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following:-
“8) The availability and location of trauma kits and those personnel designated as trauma
kit designee”
SECTION 4. Section 5 of chapter 44B of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following:-
“A city or town may appropriate money in any year from the Community Preservation
Fund for the procurement of trauma kits and a trauma kit designee in a town or city owned
building or a public school facility pursuant to section 237 of chapter 111."
of 3